Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-29,106
Noncomplying name of foreign cooperative.

(1) A foreign limited cooperative association whose name does not comply with section 21-2908 shall not obtain a certificate of authority until it adopts, for purposes of transacting business in this state, an alternative name that complies with such section. A foreign limited cooperative association that adopts an alternative name under this subsection and then obtains a certificate of authority with the name need not comply with sections 21-2907 and 21-2908. After obtaining a certificate of authority with an alternative name, a foreign limited cooperative association shall transact business in this state under the name unless the foreign limited cooperative association is authorized under sections 21-2907 and 21-2908 to transact business in this state under another name.

(2) If a foreign limited cooperative association authorized to transact business in this state changes its name to one that does not comply with sections 21-2907 and 21-2908, it shall not thereafter transact business in this state until it complies with subsection (1) of this section and obtains an amended certificate of authority.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 106.